Tennessee, session 114, HB0650.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-11-132, is amended by
redesignating the current language as subsection (a) and adding the following new subsection:
(b) The sheriff must accept surrender of a defendant by a bail bondsman or
surety, pending a hearing under § 40-11-137 to determine whether there is good cause
for the surrender.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0650
002117
- 1 -